California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
 1997, credit the taxpayers identified in this subdivision with the amount of any overpaid disability insurance pursuant to Section 17061 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. If the amount credited pursuant to this subdivision exceeds any amount then due from the taxpayer, the difference shall be refunded to the taxpayer. For taxable years 1993, 1994, and 1995, inclusive, interest, at the rate established pursuant to Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall accrue from April 15 of the tax year following the overpayment to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days.

(2) Identify and refund overpayments, with interest, to those taxpayers who have overpaid disability insurance contributions, and who have not claimed refunds due to them.

(3) Interest on overpayments of disability insurance contributions shall be allowed and paid pursuant to
 Sections 19340 and 19341 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(4) For purposes of Section 19340 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, any overpayment of disability insurance contributions shall be deemed to have been paid on the last day prescribed for filing the return under Article 1 (commencing with Section 18501) or Article 2 (commencing with Section 18601) of Chapter 2 of Part 10.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code without regard to any extension of time for filing the return with respect to which the overpayment is allowable as a credit under Section 17061 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 103.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Notice [1206. - 1206.]

1206.

A notice given under this chapter by the director, an administrative law judge, or the appeals board:

(a) May be served personally or by mail, except that service by mail given by the director shall be made by certified mail in the following cases:

(1) Under Sections 1137 and 1221.

(2) Under Sections 1131, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1184, 1733, and 1735 if the assessment is in
 excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(3) Under Section 1180 if the denial of claim for refund or credit is in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) If served by mail, the notice shall be:

(1) Addressed to the employing unit or person at his or her address as it appears on the records of the department.

(2) Complete at the time of deposit in the United States mail.

(3) Made pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure, excepting service of notice of a hearing before or an order or a decision of an administrative law judge or of the appeals board in transfer of reserve account, reassessment and refund matters.

(c) May be served electronically or by a computerized service if service by certified mail is not required and the manner of service is agreed to by the recipient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 541, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Administrative Appellate Review [1221. - 1224.]

1221.

(a) Within 10 working days of notice of an assessment pursuant to Section 1137, the employer may file a petition for reassessment of the jeopardy assessment pursuant to Section 1222.

(b) Within five days of receiving a petition for reassessment pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall notify the employer of the date and time of a preliminary hearing to determine the reasonableness of levying the assessment pursuant to Section 1137. The preliminary hearing shall be held before an administrative law judge and scheduled not less than 10 nor more than 20 days from the
 filing of the petition for reassessment. The administrative law judge shall issue a decision within 10 days of the scheduled hearing date. The date scheduled for the preliminary hearing may be continued by the administrative law judge upon the request of the employer and the director.

(c) The burden of proof on the issue of the reasonableness of levying the assessment pursuant to Section 1137 shall be on the director. In determining the reasonableness of levying the assessment pursuant to Section 1137 at the preliminary hearing, the administrative law judge shall consider and make findings on whether the director had probable cause under Section 1137.1 to levy the assessment pursuant to Section 1137. If the administrative law judge or the board, on appeal from an administrative law judge’s decision, decides that the assessment should not have been levied under Section 1137, the assessment shall automatically become, and shall have the effect
 of, an assessment pursuant to Section 1126 or 1127, whichever is applicable. If the administrative law judge or the board decides that the assessment was properly levied under Section 1137, this decision shall be incorporated in any decision rendered following the hearing pursuant to subdivision (d). The board shall expedite any appeal from an administrative law judge’s decision on a preliminary hearing.

(d) All other issues raised by a petition for reassessment filed pursuant to subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, the appropriateness of the amount assessed, shall be determined at a hearing scheduled and held pursuant to Sections 1223 and 1224.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 89, Sec. 5.   Effective May 13, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

1222.

Within 30 days of service of any notice of assessment or denial of claim for refund or credit under Section 803, 821, or 991, or of any notice under Sections 704.1, 1035, 1055, 1127.5, 1131, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1180, 1184, 1733, and 1735, any employing unit or other person given the notice, or any employing unit affected by a granting or denial of a transfer of reserve account, may file a petition for review or reassessment with an administrative law judge. The administrative law judge may for good cause grant an additional 30 days for the filing of a petition. If
 a petition for reassessment is not filed within the 30-day period, or within the additional period granted by the administrative law judge, an assessment is final at the expiration of the period. If a petition for review of a termination of elective coverage under Section 704.1 is not filed within the 30-day period, or within the additional period granted by the administrative law judge, the termination is final at the expiration of the period. If the director fails to serve notice of his or her action within 60 days after a claim for refund or credit is filed, the person or employing unit may consider the claim denied and file a petition with an administrative law judge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 643.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1223.

If any petition is filed under this article within the time and meeting requirements prescribed, an administrative law judge shall review the matter and, if requested by the petitioner, shall grant a hearing. A hearing is not required on a petition if a prior hearing has been afforded the petitioner involving the same issues, but regardless of any prior proceedings, if the petitioner files an affidavit setting forth new and additional evidence in support of his or her petition, an administrative law judge may grant an additional hearing. The administrative law judge shall give at least 20 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing on a petition by
 delivering or mailing the notice to the petitioner and to the director. The time of notice may be shortened with the consent of the parties. The administrative law judge shall render a decision in the matter and may decrease or increase the amount of any assessment under review. Every employing unit or person which is a party to the petition and the director shall be promptly notified of the administrative law judge’s decision, together with his or her reasons therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

1224.

(a) The petitioner or the director may, within 30 days after the service of notice of an administrative law judge’s decision under this article, file an appeal to the appeals board. The appeals board may for good cause extend the appeal period. If the administrative law judge fails to serve notice of the decision on a petition for review of denial of a claim for refund or credit within 60 days after a petition is filed, the petitioner may consider the petition denied and file an appeal with the appeals board. If an appeal is not filed within the 30-day period or within the additional period granted by the appeals board: 

(1) The decision of the administrative law judge upon the petition is final in every case at the expiration of the period.

(2) Any assessment involved is final at the expiration of the period except that in cases where a decision of the administrative law judge requires an adjustment of an assessment by granting a portion of a petition or by increasing an assessment, the assessment is final 30 days after service upon the petitioner by the director of a statement of amounts due setting forth the adjusted liability pursuant to the decision.

(b) In the event of an appeal to the appeals board, it may decrease or increase the amount of any assessment involved. In cases where an order or decision of the appeals board requires an adjustment of an assessment by granting a portion of a petition or by increasing an assessment,
 the order or decision and the assessment become final 30 days after service upon the petitioner by the director of a statement of amounts due setting forth the adjusted liability pursuant to the order or decision of the appeals board. In all other cases, the order or decision of the appeals board and any assessment become final 30 days after service upon the petitioner of notice of the order or decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11.5. Taxpayer’s Rights [1231. - 1237.]

1231.

(a) The department shall develop and implement a taxpayer education and information program directed at, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Taxpayer or industry groups.

(2) Department audit and compliance staff.

(3) (A) Identifying forms, procedures, regulations, or laws that are confusing and lead to taxpayer errors.

(B) Taking appropriate action, including recommending remedial legislation to change those items identified pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The education and information program described in subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) Communication with the taxpayer or industry groups which explains in simplified terms the most common errors made by taxpayers and how those errors may be avoided or corrected.

(2) Participation in small business seminars and similar programs organized by state and local agencies and may include participation in seminars organized by private organizations.

(3) In cooperation with the small business community, development of small business
 educational events and materials that explain, in simplified terms, the process of the department’s determination of whether an individual is an employee or an independent contractor. These events and materials shall be designed to address potential tax and labor law issues that may arise when small businesses contract with microbusinesses in the production and delivery of products and services.

(4) Revision of taxpayer educational materials currently produced by the department to explain in simplified terms the most common errors made by taxpayers and how those errors may be avoided or corrected.

(5) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit personnel to include the application of new legislation to taxpayer activities and to minimize recurrent taxpayer noncompliance or inconsistency of administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 828, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1233.

(a) If an employing unit’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the department, the employing unit may be relieved of the taxes assessed, or any interest, additions to tax, or penalties added thereto, as follows:

(1) Taxes or any interest, additions to tax, or penalties added thereto, shall only be relieved if the employing unit’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to the employing unit’s
 reasonable reliance on the written advice of a ruling by the director or his or her designee, and only if the department itself finds all the conditions described in subdivision (b) are satisfied.

(2) In the event that the employing unit relied on written advice of other than a ruling of the director or his or her designee, taxes shall not be relieved. Interest, additions to tax, or penalties may be waived if the department staff finds all the conditions described in subdivision (b) are satisfied.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), relief shall be granted if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The employing unit or the employing unit’s representative requested in writing that the department advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to tax under the tax laws
 administered by the department, and the specific facts and circumstances of the employment relationship, activity, or transaction were fully described in the request.

(2) The department responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described employment relationship, activity, or transaction is subject to tax, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to tax.

(3) In reasonable reliance on the department’s written advice, the person did not remit the tax due.

(4) The liability for taxes applied to a particular activity or transaction that occurred before the department rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice to the person of the rescinded or modified advice.

(5) The tax consequences expressed in the department’s written advice were not subsequently changed by any of the following:

(A) A change in state or federal statutory law or case law.

(B) A change in a federal administrative ruling or regulation where the department’s written advice was based on that federal administrative ruling or regulation.

(C) A change in material facts or circumstances relating to the taxpayer.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the department all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the department and a copy of the department’s written advice.

(2) A statement signed under penalty of perjury, setting forth the facts on which the claim is based.

(3) Any other information which the department may require.

(d) Only the person making the written request shall be entitled to rely on the department’s written advice to that person.

(e) If written advice is issued pursuant to this section, it shall include a declaration that the tax consequences expressed in the advice may be subject to change for any of the reasons specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) and that it is the duty of the requester to be aware of any of these possible changes.

(f) This section shall not apply if the requester’s request for written advice pursuant to
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) contained a misrepresentation or omission of one or more material facts.

(g) For purposes of subdivision (a), the department shall waive only that portion of tax, penalties, interest, or additions to tax attributable to the actions taken by the employing unit after receipt of the written advice of the department which were in reasonable reliance on the written advice.

(h) When a request is made for a legal ruling, the request shall specifically so state. Director rulings shall be issued as provided in published guidelines. When a director ruling is issued, the ruling shall be signed by the director or his or her designee.

(i) This section shall not apply to an employing unit that is a nonprofit organization or a governmental agency.

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no relief from unemployment insurance taxes imposed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 976) of Chapter 4 of Part 1, other than relief from interest and penalties, shall be granted pursuant to this section unless Section 1234, as enacted by the act enacting this section, becomes operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 541, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1236.

Any civil employment tax matter dispute arising under Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126), Article 9 (commencing with Section 1176), or Article 11 (commencing with Section 1221), may be settled under the following conditions:

(a) (1) The director may approve a settlement of a civil employment tax matter in dispute involving a reduction of tax or penalties, or both, that does not exceed the amount specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3). However, once an appeal of an employment tax matter dispute has been filed with the appeals board, the appeal has been assigned to an administrative law judge, and a notice of hearing has been issued,
 approval of the settlement by the assigned administrative law judge shall be obtained. If the decision of the administrative law judge has been appealed, approval of the appeals board shall be obtained. A proposed settlement shall be grounds for continuance of the scheduled hearing until the Attorney General has completed a review of the proposed settlement. “Civil employment tax matters in dispute” means those matters that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims.

(2) Except as provided by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3), each proposed settlement shall be submitted to the Attorney General. Within 30 days of receiving that proposed settlement, the Attorney General shall review the recommendation and advise, in writing, of their conclusions as to whether the recommendation is reasonable from an overall perspective. If
 the Attorney General determines that the settlement is reasonable from an overall perspective, the director, and the administrative law judge or the appeals board, as applicable, may then determine if a settlement will be approved.

(3) (A) A settlement of any civil employment tax matter dispute involving a reduction of tax or penalties, or both, in settlement, the total of which reduction of tax or penalties, or both, in settlement does not exceed eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500), may be approved by the director, and the administrative law judge or the appeals board, as applicable, without prior submission to the Attorney General.

(B) On January 1 of each calendar year beginning on January 1, 2025, the Employment Development Department
 shall increase the amount specified in subparagraph (A). That adjustment shall be made as follows:

(i) The Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit annually to the Employment Development Department the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index, as modified for rental equivalent home ownership for all items, from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current calendar year, no later than August 1 of the current calendar year.

(ii) The Employment Development Department shall then:

(I) Compute the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index from the later of June 2024 or June of the calendar year prior to the last increase in the amount specified in this subparagraph.

(II) Compute the inflation adjustment factor by adding 100 percent to the percentage change so computed, and converting the resulting percentage to the decimal equivalent.

(III) Multiply the amount specified in subparagraph (A) for the immediately preceding calendar year, as adjusted under this subparagraph, by the inflation adjustment factor determined in subclause (II), and round off the resulting product to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) The director may recommend to the appeals board a settlement of a civil employment tax matter dispute involving a reduction in tax or penalties, or both, exceeding the amount specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and arising under
 Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126), Article 9 (commencing with Section 1176), or Article 11 (commencing with Section 1221). Each proposed settlement shall be submitted to the Attorney General in the same manner as described in subdivision (a).

(c) Whenever a reduction of tax or penalties or total tax and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved pursuant to this section, there shall be placed on file in the office of the director a public record with respect to that settlement. The public record shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The name or names of the taxpayers who are parties to the settlement.

(2) The total amount involved.

(3) The amount payable or refundable pursuant to the settlement.

(4) A summary of the reasons why the settlement is in the best interests of the state.

(5) The Attorney General’s conclusion as to whether the recommendation of settlement was reasonable from an overall perspective.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure that, if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or the national defense.

(d) All settlements entered into pursuant to this section shall be final and nonappealable,
 except upon a showing of fraud or misrepresentation with respect to a material fact.

(e) Any proceedings undertaken by the appeals board relating to a settlement as described in this section shall be conducted in a closed session or sessions. Except as provided in subdivision (c), any settlement entered into pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information.

(f) Any settlement of a civil employment tax matter arising out of a disagreement between the department and the employing unit on the status of a worker as an employee or an independent contractor may also include an agreement on the prospective classification of that worker and any worker similarly situated for employment tax purposes, except as provided in subdivision (g).

(g) If a settlement includes a commitment on the prospective status of workers or reporting responsibilities of the employer, then the following shall apply:

(1) The settlement shall not operate to deprive workers of their eligibility for unemployment, workers’ compensation, or disability insurance benefits.

(2) The commitment concerning the status of workers or reporting responsibilities of the employer will terminate if there is a change in material facts, a change in an applicable statute, or a ruling by the appeals board on the workers or employer subject to the settlement that is contrary to the commitment.

(h) For purposes of this section, settlement is
 defined as a
 compromise on the amount of the tax liability, consistent with the reasonable evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(i) The amendments to this section made in the 1997 portion of the 1997–98 Regular Session shall become operative January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 18.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1237.

(a) No business entity shall discharge or otherwise discriminate against any person because he or she has sought information from the department concerning his or her rights under this code or the Labor Code, cooperated with any investigation undertaken by the department, or has testified or is about to testify in any proceeding brought pursuant to this code or the Labor Code.

(b) Any employee who believes that his or her rights under subdivision (a) have been violated may file a
 complaint with the Labor Commissioner, and with respect to that complaint shall be entitled to the same rights, remedies, and procedures as are applicable for a violation of Section 98.6 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 636, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Judicial Review [1241. - 1243.]

1241.

(a) No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount of contributions, interest or penalties alleged to have been erroneously or illegally assessed or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been filed pursuant to this chapter. Within 90 days after the service of the notice of the decision of the appeals board upon an appeal, the claimant may bring an action against the director on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been denied. The
 director may, in writing, extend for a period of not exceeding two years the time within which such action may be instituted if written request for such extension is filed with the director within the 90-day period. Failure to bring action within the time specified constitutes a waiver of any demand against the state on account of alleged overpayments. If the appeals board fails to serve notice of its decision on the appeal within 90 days after an appeal is filed, the claimant may consider the claim denied and may bring an action against the director under this section.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, any entity or organization which has made a bona fide claim that it is a church or convention or association of churches, or an organization which is operated primarily for religious purposes and which is operated, supervised, controlled, or principally supported by a church or convention or association of churches, may bring suit to
 challenge a decision of the appeals board denying an exemption as a church or religious organization by paying the amount of the last quarter assessed immediately preceding the initial appeals board decision denying the exemption and then making a claim for refund or credit pursuant to this section.

An entity or organization shall be deemed to have made a bona fide claim that it is a church or religious entity for purposes of this section if either of the following is established:

(1) That it has been recognized as a church or religious organization by any entity of state or federal government.

(2) That the appeals board found that the department has failed to show by a preponderance of the evidence admitted at the proceedings to determine tax liability that the petitioner has not made a bona fide claim of coverage under subdivision (a)
 as a church or religious entity.

(c) A petition for writ of mandate shall lie to challenge any decision denying eligibility under subdivision (b), and shall not be deemed an action proscribed by or within the meaning of Section 32 of Article XIII of the California Constitution or Section 1851. The time within which to file any claim or action under subdivision (a) shall be extended during the pendency of any action brought pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 984, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1242.

If, in any action authorized by Section 1241, judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any contributions, interest, and penalties due from the plaintiff under this division, and the balance of the judgment shall be refunded to the plaintiff. In any such judgment, interest shall be allowed and paid only to the extent that interest and penalties collected under this division are available therefor, at the rate of 12 percent per annum upon the amount of contributions found to have been illegally collected from the date of the payment of the contributions to the date of the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1082.)
-------------------------------------------

1243.

A decision of the appeals board on an appeal from a denial of a protest under Section 1034 or on an appeal from a denial or granting of an application for transfer of reserve account under Article 5 (commencing with Section 1051) shall be subject to judicial review if an appropriate proceeding is filed by the employer within 90 days of the service of notice of the decision. The director may, in writing, extend for a period of not exceeding two years the time within which such proceeding may be instituted if written request for such extension is filed with the director within the 90-day period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1082.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Unemployment Compensation Benefits [1251. - 1384.]



  ARTICLE 1. Eligibility and Disqualifications [1251. - 1265.9.]

1251.

Unemployment compensation benefits are payable from the Unemployment Fund to unemployed individuals who are eligible under this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.

(a) An individual is “unemployed” in any week in which he or she meets any of the following conditions:

(1) Any week during which he or she performs no services and with respect to which no wages are payable to him or her.

(2) Any week of less than full-time work, if the wages payable to him or her with respect to the week, when reduced by twenty-five dollars ($25) or 25 percent of the wages payable, whichever is greater, do not equal or exceed his or her weekly benefit amount.

(3) Any week for which, except for the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 1253, he or she would be eligible for benefits under Section 1253.5.

(4) Any week during which he or she performs full-time work for five days as a juror, or as a witness under subpoena.

(b) Authorized regulations shall be prescribed making such distinctions as may be necessary in the procedures applicable to unemployed individuals as to total unemployment, part-total employment, partial unemployment of individuals attached to their regular jobs, and other forms of short-time work.

(c) For the purpose of this section only “wages” includes any and all compensation for personal services whether performed as an employee or as an independent contractor or as a juror or as a witness, but does not include any payment received by a member of the National Guard or reserve component of the armed forces for inactive duty training, annual training, or emergency state active duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 761, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.1.

With respect to individuals hired as commercial fishermen a “totally unemployed individual” means an individual who, during a particular week, while still attached to his employer from the standpoint that there did not occur any severance of the employer-employee relationship, earned no wages and performed no services because his employer’s boat was tied up for one or more of the following reasons:

(a) Inclement weather.

(b) Absence of fish in fishable waters.

(c) Lack of orders for fish from buyers.

(d) Boat is laid up for repairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2164.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.2.

With respect to individuals hired as commercial fishermen a “partially unemployed individual” means an individual who, during a particular week meets all of the following conditions:

(a) Was employed by his or her regular employer in the act of catching or attempting to catch fish.

(b) Was during the week continuously attached to his or her employer from the standpoint that there did not occur any severance of the employer-employee relationship.

(c) (1) Worked less than normal customary full-time hours or full number of days per week for his or her regular employer because of lack of full-time work, or

(2) If normal customary full-time hours or full number of days per week are not determinable, he or she worked less than four (4) days during a payroll week for his or her regular employer because of lack of full-time work.

(d) Earned wages which, when reduced by twenty-five dollars ($25) or 25 percent of the wages, whichever is greater, do not equal or exceed his or her weekly benefit amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 761, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.

An unemployed individual is eligible to receive unemployment compensation benefits with respect to any week only if the director finds that:

(a) A claim for benefits with respect to that week has been made in accordance with authorized regulations.

(b) He or she has registered for work, and thereafter continued to report, at a public employment office or any other place as the director may approve. Either or both of the requirements of this subdivision may be waived or altered by authorized regulation as to partially employed individuals attached to regular jobs.

(c) He or she was able to work and available for work for that week.

(d) He has been unemployed for a waiting period of one week as defined in Section 1254, unless this waiting period has been waived pursuant to Section 8571 of the Government Code.

(e) He or she conducted a search for suitable work in accordance with specific and reasonable instructions of a public employment office.

(f) He or she participated as required by the director in reemployment activities, such as orientation and assessment if the individual has been identified pursuant to an automated profiling system as likely to exhaust regular unemployment benefits unless the individual has shown good cause for failure to participate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1116, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.1.

An unemployed individual who is in all respects otherwise eligible for unemployment compensation benefits shall not be deemed ineligible for any week in which, for not exceeding two working days, he cannot reasonably be expected to work because:

(a) He is unlawfully detained.

(b) He is lawfully detained or arrested, but the charge against such individual is subsequently dismissed.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any determination made pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section may, if no appeal has been filed therefrom, be reconsidered by the department within 15 days from the date that the charge is dismissed. Notice of any reconsidered determination shall be given to the claimant and any employer or employing unit which received notice under Section 1328 or 1331, and the claimant or employer may appeal therefrom in the manner prescribed in Section 1328.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 768.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.12.

An unemployed individual who is in all respects otherwise eligible for unemployment compensation benefits, shall not be deemed ineligible for any week in which:

(a) For not exceeding two working days, he or she cannot reasonably be expected to work because there has been a death in his or her immediate family in the state in which he or she resides.

(b) For not exceeding four working days, he or she cannot reasonably be expected to work because there has been a death in his or her immediate family outside of the state in which he or she resides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 397.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.15.

An unemployed individual who has been discharged from any branch of the United States armed services and who is in all respects otherwise eligible for unemployment compensation benefits shall not be deemed ineligible in any week for which he has unexpired leave time for which he has been compensated upon his discharge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1306.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.2.

An unemployed individual who is in all respects otherwise eligible for unemployment compensation benefits shall not be deemed ineligible for any week in which pursuant to the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement he is allowed not more than one uncompensated day off in that week or is allowed not more than one uncompensated holiday on one day in that week if:

(a) He is employed in longshoring operations;

(b) His employer regularly offers employment to individuals employed in such operations seven days a week;

(c) He is able to work and available for work for six days of the week except as provided in Section 1253.1 or 1253.12.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, unemployment compensation benefits, extended duration benefits, and federal-state extended benefits are payable on the basis of service to which Section 3309(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 applies, in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of other service subject to this division, except as provided by this section.

(b) Benefits specified by subdivision (a) based on service performed in the employ of a nonprofit organization, or of any entity as defined by Section 605, with respect to service in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an educational institution are not payable to any individual with respect to any week which begins during the period between two successive academic years or terms or, when an agreement provides instead for a similar period between two regular but not successive terms, during that period, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual’s contract, if the individual performs services in the first of the academic years or terms and if there is a contract or a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform services for any educational institution in the second of the academic years or terms.

(c) Benefits specified by subdivision (a) based on service performed in the employ of a nonprofit organization, or of any entity as defined by Section 605, with respect to service in any other capacity than specified in subdivision (b) for an educational institution shall not be payable to any individual with respect to any week which commences during a period between two successive academic years or terms if the individual performs the service in the first of the academic years or terms and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the service in the second of the academic years or terms. However, if the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform the services for an educational institution for the second of the academic years or terms, the individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for which benefits were denied solely by reason of this subdivision. Retroactive benefits shall be claimed in accordance with the department’s procedures which shall specify that except where the individual was entitled to benefits based on services performed for other than an educational institution, an individual who has a reasonable assurance of reemployment may satisfy the search for work requirement of subdivision (e) of Section 1253, by registering for work pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1253 during the period between the first and second academic terms or years. A claim for retroactive benefits may be made no later than 30 days following the commencement of the second academic year or term.
